Tennessee, session 114, SB1499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (4).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-252(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Board of communications disorders and sciences, created by § 63-17-104;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1499
010056
- 1 -